District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.09

Budget.

The Board shall submit its proposed fiscal year 2011 operating budget and each subsequent operating budget for the Corporation to the Mayor on the date that District departments and agencies are required to submit proposed budgets to the Mayor.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5120, 58 DCR 6226